Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.010

Application of chapter to district courts.

Unless otherwise expressly provided, all provisions of this chapter governing execution against personal property apply to proceedings before district courts of this state, but the district courts shall not have power to issue writs of execution against real property or any interest in real property or against a vendor's interest in a real estate contract.

[ 1987 c 442 s 401.]